Washington statutes.
RCW 2.08.200

Decisions and rulings in matters heard outside judge's district.

Any judge of the superior court of the state of Washington who shall have heard any cause, either upon motion, demurrer, issue of fact, or other matter in any county out of his or her district, may decide, rule upon, and determine the same in any county in this state, which decision, ruling, and determination shall be in writing and shall be filed immediately with the clerk of the county where such cause is pending.

[ 2011 c 336 s 19; 1901 c 57 s 2; RRS s 42.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Statute modified or superseded by CR 7(c).